engine/dictionaries/sr/sr.aff
SET UTF-8

KEY љњертзуиопшђж|асдфгхјклчћ|sџцвбнм|љањседрфтгхујиколпч|азсџдцфвгбхџнјмк|шчћ|ђћж
FLAG num
WORDCHARS .

SFX 1 Y 7
SFX 1 а а
SFX 1 а е
SFX 1 а и
SFX 1 а у
SFX 1 а о
SFX 1 а ом
SFX 1 а ама

SFX 2 Y 7
SFX 2 р р
SFX 2 р ра
SFX 2 р ру
SFX 2 р ре
SFX 2 р ром
SFX 2 р ри
SFX 2 р рима

SFX 3 Y 7
SFX 3 с с
SFX 3 с са
SFX 3 с су
SFX 3 с се
SFX 3 с сом
SFX 3 с си
SFX 3 с сима

SFX 4 Y 7
SFX 4 а а
SFX 4 а ама
SFX 4 а е
SFX 4 а и
SFX 4 а о
SFX 4 а ом
SFX 4 а у

SFX 5 Y 8
SFX 5 к к
SFX 5 к ка
SFX 5 к ку
SFX 5 к че
SFX 5 к ком
SFX 5 к ци
SFX 5 к цима
SFX 5 к ке

SFX 6 Y 5
SFX 6 е а
SFX 6 е е
SFX 6 е ем
SFX 6 е има
SFX 6 е у

SFX 7 Y 7
SFX 7 н н
SFX 7 н на
SFX 7 н ну
SFX 7 н не
SFX 7 н ном
SFX 7 н ни
SFX 7 н нима

SFX 8 Y 7
SFX 8 в в
SFX 8 в ва
SFX 8 в ву
SFX 8 в ве
SFX 8 в вом
SFX 8 в ви
SFX 8 в вима

SFX 9 Y 4
SFX 9 ст ст
SFX 9 ст сти
SFX 9 ст стима
SFX 9 ст шћу

SFX 10 Y 7
SFX 10 р р
SFX 10 р ра
SFX 10 р ре
SFX 10 р ри
SFX 10 р рима
SFX 10 р ром
SFX 10 р ру

SFX 11 Y 8
SFX 11 р р
SFX 11 р ра
SFX 11 р ру
SFX 11 р ре
SFX 11 р рем
SFX 11 р ром
SFX 11 р ри
SFX 11 р рима

SFX 12 Y 7
SFX 12 ј ј
SFX 12 ј ја
SFX 12 ј ју
SFX 12 ј је
SFX 12 ј јем
SFX 12 ј ји
SFX 12 ј јима

SFX 13 Y 7
SFX 13 м м
SFX 13 м ма
SFX 13 м му
SFX 13 м ме
SFX 13 м мом
SFX 13 м ми
SFX 13 м мима

SFX 14 Y 9
SFX 14 ац ац
SFX 14 ац аца
SFX 14 ац ацу
SFX 14 ац аче
SFX 14 ац ацем
SFX 14 ац аци
SFX 14 ац аца
SFX 14 ац ацима
SFX 14 ац аце

SFX 15 Y 8
SFX 15 ам ам
SFX 15 ам ма
SFX 15 ам му
SFX 15 ам ме
SFX 15 ам мом
SFX 15 ам ми
SFX 15 ам ама
SFX 15 ам мима

SFX 16 Y 7
SFX 16 л л
SFX 16 л ла
SFX 16 л лу
SFX 16 л ле
SFX 16 л лом
SFX 16 л ли
SFX 16 л лима

SFX 17 Y 8
SFX 17 т т
SFX 17 т та
SFX 17 т ту
SFX 17 т те
SFX 17 т том
SFX 17 т ти
SFX 17 т ата
SFX 17 т тима

SFX 18 Y 7
SFX 18 т т
SFX 18 т та
SFX 18 т ту
SFX 18 т те
SFX 18 т том
SFX 18 т ти
SFX 18 т тима

SFX 20 Y 8
SFX 20 т т
SFX 20 т та
SFX 20 т ту
SFX 20 т то
SFX 20 т те
SFX 20 т том
SFX 20 т ти
SFX 20 т тима

SFX 21 Y 9
SFX 21 ац ац
SFX 21 ац ца
SFX 21 ац цу
SFX 21 ац че
SFX 21 ац цем
SFX 21 ац ци
SFX 21 ац аца
SFX 21 ац цима
SFX 21 ац це

SFX 22 Y 9
SFX 22 ац ац
SFX 22 ац ца
SFX 22 ац цу
SFX 22 ац че
SFX 22 ац цом
SFX 22 ац ци
SFX 22 ац аца
SFX 22 ац цима
SFX 22 ац це

SFX 23 Y 7
SFX 23 з з
SFX 23 з зу
SFX 23 з за
SFX 23 з зе
SFX 23 з зом
SFX 23 з зи
SFX 23 з зима

SFX 24 Y 7
SFX 24 с с
SFX 24 с су
SFX 24 с са
SFX 24 с се
SFX 24 с сом
SFX 24 с си
SFX 24 с сима

SFX 25 Y 6
SFX 25 а а
SFX 25 а ама
SFX 25 а е
SFX 25 а и
SFX 25 а ом
SFX 25 а у

SFX 26 Y 8
SFX 26 е е
SFX 26 е ета
SFX 26 е ету
SFX 26 е етом
SFX 26 е ићи
SFX 26 е ића
SFX 26 е ићима
SFX 26 е иће

SFX 27 Y 7
SFX 27 с с
SFX 27 с са
SFX 27 с су
SFX 27 с сом
SFX 27 с си
SFX 27 с сима
SFX 27 с се

SFX 28 Y 3
SFX 28 т т
SFX 28 т ти
SFX 28 т тима

SFX 29 Y 7
SFX 29 ка ка
SFX 29 ка кама
SFX 29 ка ке
SFX 29 ка ци
SFX 29 ка ко
SFX 29 ка ком
SFX 29 ка ку

SFX 30 Y 5
SFX 30 о о
SFX 30 о а
SFX 30 о у
SFX 30 о ом
SFX 30 о има

SFX 31 Y 8
SFX 31 та та
SFX 31 та те
SFX 31 та ти
SFX 31 та ту
SFX 31 та то
SFX 31 та том
SFX 31 та тама
SFX 31 та ата

SFX 32 Y 8
SFX 32 г г
SFX 32 г га
SFX 32 г гу
SFX 32 г же
SFX 32 г гом
SFX 32 г зи
SFX 32 г зима
SFX 32 г ге

SFX 33 Y 6
SFX 33 во во
SFX 33 во ва
SFX 33 во ву
SFX 33 во вом
SFX 33 во ава
SFX 33 во вима

SFX 34 Y 7
SFX 34 д д
SFX 34 д да
SFX 34 д ду
SFX 34 д де
SFX 34 д дом
SFX 34 д ди
SFX 34 д дима

SFX 35 Y 7
SFX 35 ћ ћ
SFX 35 ћ ћа
SFX 35 ћ ће
SFX 35 ћ ћем
SFX 35 ћ ћи
SFX 35 ћ ћима
SFX 35 ћ ћу

SFX 36 Y 9
SFX 36 к к
SFX 36 к ка
SFX 36 к ку
SFX 36 к че
SFX 36 к ком
SFX 36 к кови
SFX 36 к кова
SFX 36 к ковима
SFX 36 к кове

SFX 37 Y 7
SFX 37 з з
SFX 37 з за
SFX 37 з зу
SFX 37 з зе
SFX 37 з зом
SFX 37 з зи
SFX 37 з зима

SFX 38 Y 7
SFX 38 ј ј
SFX 38 ј ја
SFX 38 ј ју
SFX 38 ј јем
SFX 38 ј ји
SFX 38 ј јима
SFX 38 ј је

SFX 39 Y 9
SFX 39 ак ак
SFX 39 ак ка
SFX 39 ак ку
SFX 39 ак че
SFX 39 ак ком
SFX 39 ак ци
SFX 39 ак ака
SFX 39 ак цима
SFX 39 ак ке

SFX 40 Y 7
SFX 40 и и
SFX 40 и ија
SFX 40 и ију
SFX 40 и ијем
SFX 40 и ији
SFX 40 и ијима
SFX 40 и ије

SFX 41 Y 8
SFX 41 ар ар
SFX 41 ар ра
SFX 41 ар ру
SFX 41 ар ре
SFX 41 ар ром
SFX 41 ар ри
SFX 41 ар ара
SFX 41 ар рима

SFX 42 Y 7
SFX 42 п п
SFX 42 п па
SFX 42 п пу
SFX 42 п пе
SFX 42 п пом
SFX 42 п пи
SFX 42 п пима

SFX 43 Y 7
SFX 43 ц ц
SFX 43 ц ца
SFX 43 ц цу
SFX 43 ц це
SFX 43 ц цом
SFX 43 ц ци
SFX 43 ц цима

SFX 44 Y 7
SFX 44 б б
SFX 44 б ба
SFX 44 б бу
SFX 44 б бе
SFX 44 б бом
SFX 44 б би
SFX 44 б бима

SFX 45 Y 9
SFX 45 д д
SFX 45 д да
SFX 45 д ду
SFX 45 д де
SFX 45 д дом
SFX 45 д дови
SFX 45 д дова
SFX 45 д довима
SFX 45 д дове

SFX 46 Y 6
SFX 46 о о
SFX 46 о а
SFX 46 о у
SFX 46 о ом
SFX 46 о има
SFX 46 о е

SFX 47 Y 3
SFX 47 е е
SFX 47 е и
SFX 47 е ама

SFX 48 Y 7
SFX 48 ф ф
SFX 48 ф фа
SFX 48 ф фу
SFX 48 ф фе
SFX 48 ф фом
SFX 48 ф фи
SFX 48 ф фима

SFX 49 Y 13
SFX 49 с с
SFX 49 с са
SFX 49 с су
SFX 49 с се
SFX 49 с сом
SFX 49 с сови
SFX 49 с сова
SFX 49 с совима
SFX 49 с сове
SFX 49 с севи
SFX 49 с сева
SFX 49 с севима
SFX 49 с севе

SFX 50 Y 7
SFX 50 ч ч
SFX 50 ч ча
SFX 50 ч чу
SFX 50 ч чем
SFX 50 ч чи
SFX 50 ч чима
SFX 50 ч че

SFX 51 Y 9
SFX 51 б б
SFX 51 б ба
SFX 51 б бу
SFX 51 б бе
SFX 51 б бом
SFX 51 б бови
SFX 51 б бова
SFX 51 б бовима
SFX 51 б бове

SFX 52 Y 7
SFX 52 ј ј
SFX 52 ј ја
SFX 52 ј ју
SFX 52 ј је
SFX 52 ј јом
SFX 52 ј ји
SFX 52 ј јима

SFX 53 Y 5
SFX 53 е е
SFX 53 е а
SFX 53 е у
SFX 53 е ем
SFX 53 е има

SFX 54 Y 8
SFX 54 ва ва
SFX 54 ва вама
SFX 54 ва ве
SFX 54 ва ви
SFX 54 ва во
SFX 54 ва вом
SFX 54 ва ву
SFX 54 ва ава

SFX 55 Y 7
SFX 55 ио и
SFX 55 ио ија
SFX 55 ио ију
SFX 55 ио ијем
SFX 55 ио ији
SFX 55 ио ијима
SFX 55 ио ије

SFX 56 Y 7
SFX 56 х х
SFX 56 х ха
SFX 56 х ху
SFX 56 х хе
SFX 56 х хом
SFX 56 х си
SFX 56 х сима

SFX 57 Y 8
SFX 57 ка ка
SFX 57 ка кама
SFX 57 ка ке
SFX 57 ка ки
SFX 57 ка ци
SFX 57 ка ко
SFX 57 ка ком
SFX 57 ка ку

SFX 58 Y 8
SFX 58 ц ц
SFX 58 ц ца
SFX 58 ц цу
SFX 58 ц цом
SFX 58 ц цови
SFX 58 ц цова
SFX 58 ц цовима
SFX 58 ц цове

SFX 59 Y 7
SFX 59 е е
SFX 59 е еа
SFX 59 е еу
SFX 59 е еом
SFX 59 е еи
SFX 59 е еима
SFX 59 е ее

SFX 60 Y 8
SFX 60 ат ат
SFX 60 ат та
SFX 60 ат ту
SFX 60 ат те
SFX 60 ат том
SFX 60 ат ти
SFX 60 ат ата
SFX 60 ат тима

SFX 61 Y 8
SFX 61 к к
SFX 61 к ка
SFX 61 к ку
SFX 61 к ком
SFX 61 к кови
SFX 61 к кова
SFX 61 к ковима
SFX 61 к кове

SFX 62 Y 7
SFX 62 ш ш
SFX 62 ш ша
SFX 62 ш шу
SFX 62 ш шем
SFX 62 ш ши
SFX 62 ш шима
SFX 62 ш ше

SFX 63 Y 8
SFX 63 х х
SFX 63 х ха
SFX 63 х ху
SFX 63 х хом
SFX 63 х хови
SFX 63 х хова
SFX 63 х ховима
SFX 63 х хове

SFX 64 Y 9
SFX 64 л л
SFX 64 л ла
SFX 64 л лу
SFX 64 л ле
SFX 64 л лом
SFX 64 л лови
SFX 64 л ловима
SFX 64 л лова
SFX 64 л лове

SFX 65 Y 9
SFX 65 т т
SFX 65 т та
SFX 65 т ту
SFX 65 т те
SFX 65 т том
SFX 65 т тови
SFX 65 т това
SFX 65 т товима
SFX 65 т тове

SFX 66 Y 4
SFX 66 о о
SFX 66 о а
SFX 66 о у
SFX 66 о ом

SFX 67 Y 9
SFX 67 т т
SFX 67 т та
SFX 67 т те
SFX 67 т това
SFX 67 т тови
SFX 67 т товима
SFX 67 т тове
SFX 67 т том
SFX 67 т ту

SFX 68 Y 9
SFX 68 ф ф
SFX 68 ф фа
SFX 68 ф фу
SFX 68 ф фе
SFX 68 ф фом
SFX 68 ф фови
SFX 68 ф фова
SFX 68 ф фовима
SFX 68 ф фове

SFX 69 Y 9
SFX 69 м м
SFX 69 м ма
SFX 69 м му
SFX 69 м ме
SFX 69 м мом
SFX 69 м мови
SFX 69 м мова
SFX 69 м мовима
SFX 69 м мове

SFX 70 Y 7
SFX 70 ш ш
SFX 70 ш ша
SFX 70 ш шу
SFX 70 ш ше
SFX 70 ш шем
SFX 70 ш ши
SFX 70 ш шима

SFX 71 Y 5
SFX 71 е е
SFX 71 е а
SFX 71 е у
SFX 71 е ом
SFX 71 е има

SFX 72 Y 9
SFX 72 ин ин
SFX 72 ин ина
SFX 72 ин ину
SFX 72 ин ине
SFX 72 ин ином
SFX 72 ин и
SFX 72 ин а
SFX 72 ин има
SFX 72 ин е

SFX 73 Y 9
SFX 73 зац зац
SFX 73 зац сца
SFX 73 зац сцу
SFX 73 зац шче
SFX 73 зац сцем
SFX 73 зац сци
SFX 73 зац заца
SFX 73 зац сцима
SFX 73 зац сце

SFX 74 Y 7
SFX 74 о о
SFX 74 о ла
SFX 74 о лу
SFX 74 о ле
SFX 74 о лом
SFX 74 о ли
SFX 74 о лима

SFX 75 Y 8
SFX 75 л л
SFX 75 л ла
SFX 75 л лу
SFX 75 л ле
SFX 75 л лом
SFX 75 л ли
SFX 75 л ала
SFX 75 л лима

SFX 76 Y 9
SFX 76 жац жац
SFX 76 жац шца
SFX 76 жац шцу
SFX 76 жац шче
SFX 76 жац шцем
SFX 76 жац шци
SFX 76 жац жаца
SFX 76 жац шцима
SFX 76 жац шце

SFX 77 Y 8
SFX 77 ма ма
SFX 77 ма ме
SFX 77 ма ми
SFX 77 ма му
SFX 77 ма мо
SFX 77 ма мом
SFX 77 ма ама
SFX 77 ма мама

SFX 78 Y 8
SFX 78 е е
SFX 78 е еа
SFX 78 е еу
SFX 78 е еом
SFX 78 е еи
SFX 78 е еа
SFX 78 е еима
SFX 78 е ее

SFX 79 Y 6
SFX 79 е е
SFX 79 е еа
SFX 79 е еу
SFX 79 е еом
SFX 79 е еи
SFX 79 е еима

SFX 80 Y 8
SFX 80 ска ска
SFX 80 ска скама
SFX 80 ска ске
SFX 80 ска ски
SFX 80 ска ско
SFX 80 ска ском
SFX 80 ска ску
SFX 80 ска сака

SFX 81 Y 7
SFX 81 љо љо
SFX 81 љо ља
SFX 81 љо љу
SFX 81 љо љом
SFX 81 љо љи
SFX 81 љо љима
SFX 81 љо ље

SFX 82 Y 3
SFX 82 и и
SFX 82 и а
SFX 82 и има

SFX 83 Y 8
SFX 83 ал ал
SFX 83 ал ла
SFX 83 ал лу
SFX 83 ал ле
SFX 83 ал лом
SFX 83 ал ли
SFX 83 ал ала
SFX 83 ал лима

SFX 84 Y 9
SFX 84 п п
SFX 84 п па
SFX 84 п пу
SFX 84 п пе
SFX 84 п пом
SFX 84 п пови
SFX 84 п пова
SFX 84 п повима
SFX 84 п пове

SFX 85 Y 7
SFX 85 љ љ
SFX 85 љ ља
SFX 85 љ љу
SFX 85 љ љем
SFX 85 љ љи
SFX 85 љ љима
SFX 85 љ ље

SFX 86 Y 9
SFX 86 с с
SFX 86 с са
SFX 86 с су
SFX 86 с се
SFX 86 с сом
SFX 86 с сови
SFX 86 с сова
SFX 86 с совима
SFX 86 с сове

SFX 87 Y 7
SFX 87 ж ж
SFX 87 ж жа
SFX 87 ж жу
SFX 87 ж жом
SFX 87 ж жи
SFX 87 ж жима
SFX 87 ж же

SFX 88 Y 8
SFX 88 ск ск
SFX 88 ск ска
SFX 88 ск ску
SFX 88 ск шче
SFX 88 ск ском
SFX 88 ск сци
SFX 88 ск сцима
SFX 88 ск ске

SFX 89 Y 7
SFX 89 е е
SFX 89 е еа
SFX 89 е еу
SFX 89 е еи
SFX 89 е еом
SFX 89 е еима
SFX 89 е ее

SFX 90 Y 7
SFX 90 га га
SFX 90 га ге
SFX 90 га зи
SFX 90 га гу
SFX 90 га го
SFX 90 га гом
SFX 90 га гама

SFX 91 Y 8
SFX 91 х х
SFX 91 х ха
SFX 91 х ху
SFX 91 х ше
SFX 91 х хом
SFX 91 х си
SFX 91 х сима
SFX 91 х хе

SFX 92 Y 7
SFX 92 х х
SFX 92 х ха
SFX 92 х ху
SFX 92 х хом
SFX 92 х си
SFX 92 х сима
SFX 92 х хе

SFX 93 Y 9
SFX 93 л л
SFX 93 л ла
SFX 93 л лу
SFX 93 л ле
SFX 93 л лом
SFX 93 л лови
SFX 93 л лова
SFX 93 л ловима
SFX 93 л лове

SFX 94 Y 9
SFX 94 ш ш
SFX 94 ш ша
SFX 94 ш шу
SFX 94 ш ше
SFX 94 ш шем
SFX 94 ш шеви
SFX 94 ш шева
SFX 94 ш шевима
SFX 94 ш шеве

SFX 95 Y 9
SFX 95 н н
SFX 95 н на
SFX 95 н ну
SFX 95 н не
SFX 95 н ном
SFX 95 н нови
SFX 95 н нова
SFX 95 н новима
SFX 95 н нове

SFX 96 Y 9
SFX 96 лац лац
SFX 96 лац оца
SFX 96 лац оцу
SFX 96 лац оче
SFX 96 лац оцем
SFX 96 лац оци
SFX 96 лац лаца
SFX 96 лац оцима
SFX 96 лац оце

SFX 97 Y 9
SFX 97 т т
SFX 97 т та
SFX 97 т ту
SFX 97 т те
SFX 97 т том
SFX 97 т теви
SFX 97 т тева
SFX 97 т теве
SFX 97 т тевима

SFX 98 Y 9
SFX 98 ам ам
SFX 98 ам ма
SFX 98 ам му
SFX 98 ам ме
SFX 98 ам мом
SFX 98 ам мови
SFX 98 ам мова
SFX 98 ам мовима
SFX 98 ам мове

SFX 99 Y 8
SFX 99 јка јка
SFX 99 јка јкама
SFX 99 јка јке
SFX 99 јка јко
SFX 99 јка јком
SFX 99 јка јку
SFX 99 јка јци
SFX 99 јка јака

SFX 100 Y 8
SFX 100 бак бак
SFX 100 бак пка
SFX 100 бак пку
SFX 100 бак пком
SFX 100 бак пци
SFX 100 бак бака
SFX 100 бак пцима
SFX 100 бак пке

SFX 101 Y 9
SFX 101 бац бац
SFX 101 бац пца
SFX 101 бац пцу
SFX 101 бац пче
SFX 101 бац пцем
SFX 101 бац пци
SFX 101 бац баца
SFX 101 бац пцима
SFX 101 бац пце

SFX 102 Y 3
SFX 102 е е
SFX 102 е а
SFX 102 е ама

SFX 103 Y 7
SFX 103 љ љ
SFX 103 љ ља
SFX 103 љ љу
SFX 103 љ ље
SFX 103 љ љем
SFX 103 љ љи
SFX 103 љ љима

SFX 104 Y 8
SFX 104 г г
SFX 104 г га
SFX 104 г гу
SFX 104 г гом
SFX 104 г гови
SFX 104 г гова
SFX 104 г говима
SFX 104 г гове

SFX 105 Y 11
SFX 105 м м
SFX 105 м ма
SFX 105 м му
SFX 105 м ме
SFX 105 м мом
SFX 105 м мови
SFX 105 м мова
SFX 105 м мовима
SFX 105 м мове
SFX 105 м ми
SFX 105 м мима

SFX 106 Y 4
SFX 106 е е
SFX 106 е а
SFX 106 е у
SFX 106 е ем

SFX 107 Y 8
SFX 107 ањ ањ
SFX 107 ањ ња
SFX 107 ањ њу
SFX 107 ањ њем
SFX 107 ањ њеви
SFX 107 ањ њева
SFX 107 ањ њевима
SFX 107 ањ њеве

SFX 108 Y 7
SFX 108 о о
SFX 108 о а
SFX 108 о у
SFX 108 о ом
SFX 108 о и
SFX 108 о има
SFX 108 о е

SFX 109 Y 9
SFX 109 сац сац
SFX 109 сац сца
SFX 109 сац сцу
SFX 109 сац шче
SFX 109 сац сцем
SFX 109 сац сци
SFX 109 сац саца
SFX 109 сац сцима
SFX 109 сац сце
